Illinois, session 104th, HB4842.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The First Responders Suicide Prevention Act is 5amended by changing Section 20 and by adding Section 23 as 6follows: 7    (5 ILCS 840/20)8    Sec. 20. Confidentiality; exemptions. 9    (a) Any communication made by an employee of an emergency 10services provider or law enforcement agency or peer support 11advisor in a peer support counseling session and any oral or 12written information conveyed in the peer support counseling 13session is confidential and may not be disclosed by any person 14participating in the peer support counseling session and shall 15not be released to any person or entity. 16    (b) Any communication relating to a peer support 17counseling session made confidential under this Section that 18is made between peer support advisors and the supervisors or 19staff of a peer support counseling program, or between the 20supervisor or staff of a peer support counseling program, is 21confidential and may not be disclosed.22    (c) This Section does not prohibit any communications 23between counselors who conduct peer support counseling   HB4842 Enrolled- 2 -LRB104 16619 BDA 30020 b1sessions or any communications between counselors and the 2supervisors or staff of a peer support counseling program. 3    (c-5) Any communication described in subsection (a) or (b) 4is subject to subpoena for good cause shown.5    (d) The privileges established under this Section do not 6apply if any of the following occur:7        (1) the communication indicates an intent to engage in 8    conduct likely to result in imminent death or serious 9    physical injury to the participant or another individual;10        (2) the person receiving the peer support counseling 11    session discloses information that is required to be 12    reported under the mandated reporting laws, including, but 13    not limited to, the reporting of maltreatment of minors, 14    the reporting of maltreatment of vulnerable adults, 15    provided the disclosure is only for the purpose of 16    reporting maltreatment and limited to information 17    necessary to make such a report;18        (3) the participant expressly waives the privilege or 19    gives consent to disclosure of the privileged 20    communication;21        (4) the participant is deceased and the surviving 22    spouse or the executor or administrator of the estate of 23    the deceased participant expressly waives the privilege or 24    gives consent to disclosure of the privileged 25    communication; or26        (5) the participant sought or obtained the peer   HB4842 Enrolled- 3 -LRB104 16619 BDA 30020 b1    support counseling services to enable or aid anyone to 2    commit or plan to commit what the participant knew, or 3    reasonably should have known, was a crime or fraud. This 4    Section does not apply to: 5        (1) any threat of suicide or homicide made by a 6    participant in a peer support counseling session or any 7    information conveyed in a peer support counseling session 8    related to a threat of suicide or homicide;9        (2) any information mandated by law or agency policy 10    to be reported, including, but not limited to, domestic 11    violence, child abuse or neglect, or elder abuse or 12    neglect;13        (3) any admission of criminal conduct; or14        (4) an admission or act of refusal to perform duties 15    to protect others or the employee of the emergency 16    services provider or law enforcement agency.17    (e) All communications, notes, records, and reports 18arising out of a peer support counseling session are not 19subject to disclosure under Section 7.5 of the Freedom of 20Information Act. 21    (e-5) A department that establishes a peer support 22counseling program shall develop a policy or rule that imposes 23disciplinary measures against a peer support advisor who 24violates the confidentiality of the peer support counseling 25program by sharing information learned in a peer support 26counseling session with department personnel who are not   HB4842 Enrolled- 4 -LRB104 16619 BDA 30020 b1supervisors or staff of the peer support counseling program, 2unless the information is related to the exemptions in 3subsection (d).4    (e-10) Confidentiality protections under this Act apply 5regardless of whether the peer support advisor is employed by, 6or affiliated with, the same agency as the first responder 7receiving support. 8    (f) A cause of action exists for public safety personnel 9or emergency services personnel if the emergency services 10provider or law enforcement agency uses confidential 11information obtained during a confidential peer support 12counseling session conducted by a law enforcement agency or by 13an emergency services provider for an adverse employment 14action against the participant.15(Source: P.A. 101-375, eff. 8-16-19.) 16    (5 ILCS 840/23 new)17    Sec. 23. Confidentiality of critical incident stress 18management communications.19    (a) In this Section:20    "Civilian employee" means an employee of a law 21enforcement, fire, or emergency medical services agency who is 22not a first responder.23    "Critical incident" means an event that results in acute 24or cumulative psychological stress or trauma to emergency 25service personnel. "Critical incident" includes, but is not   HB4842 Enrolled- 5 -LRB104 16619 BDA 30020 b1limited to, an encounter that may result in the death of or 2serious injury to another person or the imminent potential of 3such death or serious bodily injury, a fatal motor vehicle 4accident, a child abuse investigation, a death investigation, 5a large-scale, human-made or natural disaster, or situations 6or incidents during the course of a first responder's duties 7that cause cumulative exposure to stress.8    "Critical incident stress management services" or "CISM 9services" means consultation, risk assessment, education, 10intervention, and other crisis intervention services provided 11by a CISM team or CISM team member to a first responder, 12civilian employee or an immediate family member of a first 13responder or civilian employee before, during, or after a 14critical incident.15    "Critical incident stress management team" means a group 16that is organized to provide critical incident stress 17management to emergency service providers and that consists of 18critical incident stress management team members. "Critical 19incident stress management team" includes members from any 20emergency service discipline, mental health professionals, and 21designated emergency service chaplains.22    "Critical incident stress management team member" or "CISM 23team member" means an individual who satisfies all of the 24following:25        (1) is specially trained to provide CISM services to 26    assist and provide support to a first responder who has   HB4842 Enrolled- 6 -LRB104 16619 BDA 30020 b1    been involved in a critical incident that may affect, or 2    has affected, the person's work performance or general 3    well-being; and4        (2) meets the requirements of a nationally accredited 5    critical incident stress management organization or 6    network.7    "First responders" means federal, State, and local law 8enforcement officers, fire and emergency medical services 9personnel, hazardous materials response team members, 9-1-1 10dispatchers, chaplains, or any individuals who are responsible 11for the protection and preservation of life, property, and 12evidence and who have been sent or directed to respond to a 13request for assistance as a result of a critical incident.14    "Immediate family member" means a spouse, dating partner, 15person with a child in common, parent, child, step-relative, 16and people sharing a dwelling.17    "Participant" means any of the following:18        (1) a first responder who obtains or has obtained CISM 19    services or wellness program services;20        (2) a first responder's immediate family member who 21    obtains or has obtained wellness program services;22        (3) a civilian employee who obtains or has obtained 23    wellness program services; or24        (4) a civilian employee's immediate family member who 25    obtains or has obtained wellness program services.26    "Trained peer support member" means a first responder who   HB4842 Enrolled- 7 -LRB104 16619 BDA 30020 b1is designated as a peer support member by a State, county, or 2municipal law enforcement, fire, or emergency medical services 3agency and who is specially trained to provide a participant 4with wellness program services.5    "Wellness program" means a voluntary and comprehensive 6health initiative designed to improve the well-being of 7participants through the use of trained peer support members.8    "Wellness program services" means any one or more of the 9following services provided through a wellness program:10        (1) counseling;11        (2) spiritual guidance; and12        (3) education about financial resources, health 13    resources, legal assistance, and stress management 14    services.15    (b) Except as provided in subsections (c-5) and (d) of 16this Section, all proceedings, communications, and records, 17including any information acquired by a CISM team, CISM team 18member, or trained peer support member from a participant, are 19confidential. A CISM team member or trained peer support 20member may not be compelled to disclose the proceedings, 21communications, or records, including any information 22acquired, through compulsory legal process, and the 23confidential proceedings, communications, records, and 24information under this subsection (b) are not discoverable or 25admissible in evidence in any action, including any legal 26proceeding, trial, or investigation unless the confidentiality   HB4842 Enrolled- 8 -LRB104 16619 BDA 30020 b1is waived by the affected participant.2    (c) The privileges in subsection (b) of this Section apply 3only if the proceedings, communications, or records, including 4information acquired, are obtained during the provision of 5CISM services or wellness program services.6    (c-5) Any communication under subsection (b) is subject to 7a subpoena for good cause shown.8    (d) The privileges established under subsection (b) of 9this Section do not apply if any of the following occur:10        (1) the communication indicates an intent to engage in 11    conduct likely to result in imminent death or serious 12    physical injury to the participant or another individual;13        (2) the person receiving critical incident stress 14    management services discloses information that is required 15    to be reported under the mandated reporting laws, 16    including, but not limited to, the reporting of 17    maltreatment of minors or the reporting of maltreatment of 18    vulnerable adults, provided the disclosure is only for the 19    purpose of reporting maltreatment and limited to 20    information necessary to make such a report;21        (3) the participant expressly waives the privilege or 22    gives consent to disclosure of the privileged 23    communication;24        (4) the participant is deceased and the surviving 25    spouse or the executor or administrator of the estate of 26    the deceased participant expressly waives the privilege or   HB4842 Enrolled- 9 -LRB104 16619 BDA 30020 b1    gives consent to disclosure of the privileged 2    communication; or3        (5) the participant sought or obtained the CISM 4    services or wellness program services to enable or aid 5    anyone to commit or plan to commit what the participant 6    knew, or reasonably should have known, was a fraud or 7    other crime.8    (e) Information otherwise available from the original 9source is not privileged from discovery or use in any civil or 10criminal action merely because the information was disclosed 11by a participant during CISM services or wellness program 12services if the disclosure of the information sought is 13otherwise permissible and the information is otherwise 14discoverable.